District of Columbia statutes.
48-831.22

Eligibility for low-income elderly.

To be eligible, an individual shall:

(1)

Be a resident of the District;

(2)

Be at least 62 years of age; and

(3)

Have a household income that is not more than 200% of the federal poverty level.

History

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 122, 51 DCR 3688